Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB154.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 336.130 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Employees may, free from restraint or coercion by the employers or their agents,
associate collectively for self-organization and designate collectively
representatives of their own choosing to negotiate the terms and conditions of their
employment to effectively promote their own rights and general welfare.
Employees, collectively and individually, may strike, engage in peaceful picketing,
and assemble collectively for peaceful purposes[, except that no public employee,
collectively or individually, may engage in a strike or a work stoppage. Nothing in
this statute and KRS 65.015, 67A.6904, 67C.406, 70.262, 78.470, 78.480, 336.132,
336.134, 336.180, 336.990, and 345.050 shall be construed as altering, amending,
granting, or removing the rights of public employees to associate collectively for
self-organization and designate collectively representatives of their own choosing to
negotiate the terms and conditions of their employment to effectively promote their
own rights and general welfare].
(2) Neither employers or their agents nor employees or associations, organizations or
groups of employees shall engage or be permitted to engage in unfair or illegal acts
or practices or resort to violence, intimidation, threats or coercion.
(3) [(a) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section or any provision of the
Kentucky Revised Statutes to the contrary, no employee shall be required, as a
condition of employment or continuation of employment, to:
1. Become or remain a member of a labor organization;
2. Pay any dues, fees, assessments, or other similar charges of any kind or
amount to a labor organization; or
3. Pay to any charity or other third party, in lieu of these payments, any
amount equivalent to or pro rata portion of dues, fees, assessments, or
Page 1 of 18
XXXX 11/25/2024 8:52 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 164
other charges required of a labor organization.
(b) As used in this subsection, the term "employee" means any person employed
by or suffered or permitted to work for a public or private employer.
(4) The secretary of the Education and Labor Cabinet or his or her representative shall
investigate complaints of violations or threatened violations of subsection (3) of this
section and may initiate enforcement of a criminal penalty by causing a complaint
to be filed with the appropriate local prosecutor and ensure effective enforcement.
(5) ]Except in instances where violence, personal injury, or damage to property have
occurred and such occurrence is supported by an affidavit setting forth the facts and
circumstances surrounding such incidents, the employees and their agents shall not
be restrained or enjoined from exercising the rights granted them in subsection (1)
of this section without a hearing first being held, unless the employees or their
agents are engaged in a strike in violation of a "no strike" clause in their labor
contract.
(4)[(6)] Submission of a false affidavit concerning violence, personal injury, or
damage to property shall constitute a violation of KRS 523.030. In the absence of
any such affidavit alleging violence, personal injury, or damage injunctions shall be
issued only by a Circuit Judge or other justice or judge acting as a Circuit Judge
pursuant to law.
Section 2. KRS 336.180 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 336.190 and 336.200[this chapter], unless the context requires
otherwise,[:
(1) "Candidate" means any person who has received contributions or made
expenditures, has appointed a campaign treasurer, or has given his or her consent
for any other person to receive contributions or make expenditures with a view to
bringing about his or her nomination or election to public office, except federal
office;
Page 2 of 18
XXXX 11/25/2024 8:52 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 164
(2) "Committee" includes the following:
(a) "Campaign committee," which means one (1) or more persons who receive
contributions and make expenditures to support or oppose one (1) or more
specific candidates or slates of candidates for nomination or election to any
state, county, city, or district office, but does not include an entity established
solely by a candidate which is managed solely by a candidate and a campaign
treasurer and whose name is generic in nature, such as "Friends of (the
candidate)," and does not reflect that other persons have structured themselves
as a committee, designated officers of the committee, and assigned
responsibilities and duties to each officer with the purpose of managing a
campaign to support or oppose a candidate in an election;
(b) "Caucus campaign committee," which means members of any caucus groups
who receive contributions and make expenditures to support or oppose one (1)
or more specific candidates or slates of candidates for nomination or election
to any state, county, city, or district office, or a committee in Kentucky or in
any other state. Caucus campaign committees include but are not limited to:
1. The House Democratic caucus campaign committee;
2. The House Republican caucus campaign committee;
3. The Senate Democratic caucus campaign committee;
4. The Senate Republican caucus campaign committee; and
5. Subdivisions of the state executive committee of a minor political party,
which serve the same function as the above-named committees, as
determined by administrative regulations promulgated by the Kentucky
Registry of Election Finance;
(c) "Political issues committee," which means three (3) or more persons joining
together to advocate or oppose a constitutional amendment or ballot measure
if that committee receives or expends money in excess of one thousand dollars
Page 3 of 18
XXXX 11/25/2024 8:52 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 164
($1,000);
(d) "Permanent committee," which means a group of individuals, including an
association, committee, or organization, other than a campaign committee,
political issues committee, inaugural committee, caucus campaign committee,
or a party executive committee, which is established as, or intended to be, a
permanent organization having as a primary purpose expressly advocating the
election or defeat of one (1) or more clearly identified candidates, slates of
candidates, or political parties, which functions on a regular basis throughout
the year;
(e) An executive committee of a political party; and
(f) "Inaugural committee," which means one (1) or more persons who receive
contributions and make expenditures in support of inauguration activities for
any candidate or slate of candidates elected to any state, county, city, or
district office;
(3) "Contributing organization" means a group which merely contributes to candidates,
slates of candidates, campaign committees, caucus campaign committees, or
executive committees from time to time from funds derived solely from within the
group, and which does not solicit or receive funds from sources outside the group
itself;
(4) "Contribution" means any:
(a) Payment, distribution, loan, deposit, or gift of money or other thing of value,
to a candidate, his or her agent, a slate of candidates, its authorized agent, a
committee, or contributing organization but shall not include a loan of money
by any financial institution doing business in Kentucky made in accordance
with applicable banking laws and regulations and in the ordinary course of
business. As used in this subsection, "loan" shall include a guarantee,
endorsement, or other form of security where the risk of nonpayment rests
Page 4 of 18
XXXX 11/25/2024 8:52 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 164
with the surety, guarantor, or endorser, as well as with a committee,
contributing organization, candidate, slate of candidates, or other primary
obligor. No person shall become liable as surety, endorser, or guarantor for
any sum in any one (1) election which, when combined with all other
contributions the individual makes to a candidate, his or her agent, a slate of
candidates, its agent, a committee, or a contributing organization, exceeds the
contribution limits provided in KRS 121.150;
(b) Payment by any person other than the candidate, his or her authorized
treasurer, a slate of candidates, its authorized treasurer, a committee, or a
contributing organization, of compensation for the personal services of
another person which are rendered to a candidate, slate of candidates,
committee, or contributing organization, or for inauguration activities;
(c) Goods, advertising, or services with a value of more than one hundred dollars
($100) in the aggregate in any one (1) election which are furnished to a
candidate, slate of candidates, committee, or contributing organization or for
inauguration activities without charge, or at a rate which is less than the rate
normally charged for the goods or services; or
(d) Payment by any person other than a candidate, his or her authorized treasurer,
a slate of candidates, its authorized treasurer, a committee, or contributing
organization for any goods or services with a value of more than one hundred
dollars ($100) in the aggregate in any one (1) election which are utilized by a
candidate, slate of candidates, committee, or contributing organization, or for
inauguration activities;
(5) "Election" means any primary, regular, or special election. Each primary, regular,
or special election shall be considered a separate election;
(6) "Electioneering communications" means:
(a) Any communication broadcast by television or radio, printed in a newspaper
Page 5 of 18
XXXX 11/25/2024 8:52 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 164
or on a billboard, directly mailed or delivered by hand to personal residences,
or in telephone calls made to personal residences, or otherwise distributed
that:
1. Unambiguously refers to any candidate for any state, county, city, or
district office, or to any ballot measure;
2. Is broadcast, printed, mailed, delivered, made, or distributed within
thirty (30) days before a primary election or sixty (60) days before a
general election; and
3. Is broadcast to, printed in a newspaper, distributed to, mailed to or
delivered by hand to, in telephone calls made to, or otherwise distributed
to an audience that includes members of the electorate for such public
office or the electorate associated with the ballot containing the ballot
measure.
(b) "Electioneering communications" does not include:
1. Any news articles, editorial endorsements, opinions or commentary,
writings, or letters to the editor printed in a newspaper, magazine, or
other periodical not owned by or controlled by a candidate, committee,
or political party;
2. Any editorial endorsements or opinions aired by a broadcast facility not
owned or controlled by a candidate, committee, or political party;
3. Any communication by persons made in the regular course and scope of
their business or any communication made by a membership
organization solely to members of such an organization and their
families;
4. Any communication that refers to any candidate only as part of the
popular name of a bill or statute; or
5. A communication that constitutes a contribution or independent
Page 6 of 18
XXXX 11/25/2024 8:52 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 164
expenditure as defined in this section;
(7) "Employer" means all persons, firms, associations, corporations, public employers,
public school employers, and public colleges, universities, institutions, and
education agencies;
(8) "Fundraiser" means an individual who directly solicits and secures contributions on
behalf of a candidate or slate of candidates for a statewide-elected state office, or an
office in a jurisdiction with a population in excess of two hundred thousand
(200,000) residents;
(9) "Independent expenditure" means the expenditure of money or other things of value
for a communication which expressly advocates the election or defeat of a clearly
identified candidate or slate of candidates, and which is made without any
coordination, consultation, or cooperation with any candidate, slate of candidates,
campaign committee, or any authorized person acting on behalf of any of them, and
which is not made in concert with, or at the request or suggestion of any candidate,
slate of candidates, campaign committee, or any authorized person acting on behalf
of any of them;
(10) ]"labor organization" means any organization of any kind, or any agency or
employee representation committee or plan, in which employees participate and[,
association or union] which exists for the purpose, in whole or in part, of dealing
with employers concerning grievances, labor disputes, wages, rates of pay, hours
of employment or conditions of work[, or other forms of compensation. Except, for
the purposes of this section or KRS 161.158, 164.365, 336.133, 336.134, 336.1341,
336.135, or 336.990, "labor organization" shall not include organizations which
primarily represent public employees working in the protective vocations of active
law enforcement officer, jail and corrections officer, or active fire suppression or
prevention personnel;
(11) "Political activities" means any contribution or independent expenditure made:
Page 7 of 18
XXXX 11/25/2024 8:52 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 164
(a) To any committee;
(b) To any contributing organization;
(c) To any candidate;
(d) To any slate of candidates;
(e) To any fundraiser;
(f) For any electioneering communications;
(g) For any testimonial affair;
(h) In any manner intended to influence the outcome of any election;
(i) In any manner intended to otherwise promote or support the defeat of any:
1. Candidate;
2. Slate of candidates; or
3. Ballot measure; or
(j) In any manner intended to advance any position held by any person or entity
other than the public employee regarding any:
1. Election;
2. Candidate;
3. Slate of candidates; or
4. Ballot measure;
(12) "Public employee" means an employee of a "public agency" as that term is defined
in KRS 61.870;
(13) "Slate of candidates" means:
(a) Between the time a certificate or petition of nomination has been filed for a
candidate for the office of Governor under KRS 118.365 and the time the
candidate designates a running mate for the office of Lieutenant Governor
under KRS 118.126, a slate of candidates consists of the candidate for the
office of Governor; and
(b) After that candidate has designated a running mate under KRS 118.126, that
Page 8 of 18
XXXX 11/25/2024 8:52 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 164
same slate of candidates consists of that same candidate for the office of
Governor and the candidate's running mate for the office of Lieutenant
Governor. Unless the context requires otherwise, any provision of law that
applies to a candidate shall also apply to a slate of candidates; and
(14) "Testimonial affair" means an affair held in honor of a person who holds or who is
or was a candidate for nomination or election to a state, city, county, or district
political office designed to raise funds for the purpose of influencing the outcome
of an election, otherwise promoting support for, or the defeat of, any candidate,
slate of candidates, or ballot measure].
Section 3. KRS 336.990 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Upon proof that any person employed by the Education and Labor Cabinet as a
labor inspector has taken any part in any strike, lockout or similar labor dispute, the
person shall forfeit his or her office.
(2) The following civil penalties shall be imposed, in accordance with the provisions in
KRS 336.985, for violations of the provisions of this chapter:
(a) Any person who violates KRS 336.110 or 336.130 shall for each offense be
assessed a civil penalty of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more
than one thousand dollars ($1,000);
(b) Any corporation, association, organization, or person that violates KRS
336.190 and 336.200 shall be assessed a civil penalty of not less than one
hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each
offense. Each act of violation, and each day during which such an agreement
remains in effect, shall constitute a separate offense;
(c) Any employer who violates the provisions of KRS 336.220 shall be assessed a
civil penalty of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one
thousand dollars ($1,000) for each violation; and
(d) Any labor organization who violates KRS 336.135 shall be assessed a civil
Page 9 of 18
XXXX 11/25/2024 8:52 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 164
penalty of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one
thousand dollars ($1,000) for each offense.
(e) Any public employer or labor organization that violates KRS 161.158,
164.365, 336.133,[ 336.134,] 336.1341, 336.135, or 336.180 shall be assessed
a civil penalty of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one
thousand dollars ($1,000) for each offense[.
(3) Any labor organization, employer, or other person who directly or indirectly
violates KRS 336.130(3) shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.
(4) Any person aggrieved as a result of any violation or threatened violation of KRS
336.130(3) may seek abatement of the violation or threatened violation by
petitioning a court of competent jurisdiction for injunctive relief and shall be
entitled to costs and reasonable attorney fees if he or she prevails in the action.
(5) Any person injured as a result of any violation or threatened violation of KRS
336.130(3) may recover all damages resulting from the violation or threatened
violation and shall be entitled to costs and reasonable attorney fees if he or she
prevails in the action].
Section 4. KRS 67A.6904 is amended to read as follows:
(1) [Except as provided in KRS 336.130, ]Urban-county governments and their
representatives and agents are prohibited from:
(a) Interfering, restraining, or coercing police officers, firefighter personnel,
firefighters, or corrections personnel in the exercise of the rights guaranteed in
KRS 67A.6902;
(b) Dominating or interfering with the formation, existence, or administration of
any labor organization;
(c) Discriminating in regard to hiring or tenure of employment or any term or
condition of employment to encourage or discourage membership in any labor
organization, provided that nothing in this section or in any other statute to
Page 10 of 18
XXXX 11/25/2024 8:52 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 164
the contrary shall preclude an urban-county government from making an
agreement with a labor organization to require as a condition of
employment membership therein on or after the thirtieth day following the
beginning of that employment or on the effective date of the agreement,
whichever is later;
(d) Discharging or otherwise discriminating against an employee because he or
she has signed or filed any affidavit, petition, or complaint or given any
information or testimony under this section; or
(e) Refusing to bargain collectively in good faith with a labor organization which
is the exclusive representative of employees in an appropriate unit, including
but not limited to the discussing of grievances with the exclusive
representative.
(2) Labor organizations and their agents are prohibited from:
(a) Restraining or coercing:
1. Police officers, firefighter personnel, firefighters, or corrections
personnel in the exercise of the right guaranteed in KRS 67A.6902; and
2. An urban-county government in the selection of a representative for the
purposes of collective bargaining or the adjustment of grievances; or
(b) Refusing to bargain collectively in good faith with an urban-county
government, if they have been designated in accordance with the provisions of
this section as the exclusive representative of police officers, firefighter
personnel, firefighters, or corrections personnel in an appropriate unit.
(3) For the purposes of this section, to bargain collectively is to carry out in good faith
the mutual obligation of the parties, or their representatives; to meet together at
reasonable times, including meetings in advance of the budget-making process; to
negotiate in good faith with respect to wages, hours, and other conditions of
employment; to negotiate an agreement; to negotiate any question arising under any
Page 11 of 18
XXXX 11/25/2024 8:52 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 164
agreement; and to execute a written contract incorporating any agreement reached,
if requested by either party. The obligation shall not be interpreted to compel either
party to agree to a proposal, or require either party to make a concession.
Section 5. KRS 67C.406 is amended to read as follows:
(1) [Except as provided in KRS 336.130(3), ]Consolidated local governments, their
representatives, or their agents are prohibited from:
(a) Interfering, restraining, or coercing police officers in the exercise of the rights
guaranteed in KRS 67C.402;
(b) Dominating or interfering with the formation, existence, or administration of
any labor organization;
(c) Discriminating in regard to hiring or tenure of employment or any term or
condition of employment to encourage or discourage membership in any labor
organization, provided that nothing in this section or in any other statute to
the contrary shall preclude a consolidated local government from making
an agreement with a labor organization to require as a condition of
employment membership therein on or after the thirtieth day following the
beginning of that employment or on the effective date of the agreement,
whichever is later;
(d) Discharging or otherwise discriminating against an employee because he or
she has signed or filed any affidavit, petition, or complaint or given any
information or testimony under this section; or
(e) Refusing to bargain collectively in good faith with a labor organization which
is the exclusive representative of employees in an appropriate unit, including
but not limited to the discussing of grievances with the exclusive
representative.
(2) Labor organizations or their agents are prohibited from:
(a) Restraining or coercing:
Page 12 of 18
XXXX 11/25/2024 8:52 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 164
1. Police officers in the exercise of the right guaranteed in KRS 67C.402;
and
2. A consolidated local government in the selection of a representative for
the purposes of collective bargaining or the adjustment of grievances; or
(b) Refusing to bargain collectively in good faith with a consolidated local
government, if they have been designated in accordance with the provisions of
this section as the exclusive representative of police officers in an appropriate
unit.
(3) For the purposes of this section, to bargain collectively is to carry out in good faith
the mutual obligation of the parties, or their representatives; to meet together at
reasonable times, including meetings in advance of the budget-making process; to
negotiate in good faith with respect to wages, hours, and other conditions of
employment; to negotiate an agreement; to negotiate any question arising under any
agreement; and to execute a written contract incorporating any agreement reached,
if requested by either party. The obligation shall not be interpreted to compel either
party to agree to a proposal, or require either party to make a concession.
Section 6. KRS 70.262 is amended to read as follows:
(1) [Except as provided in KRS 336.130, ]In any county containing a consolidated local
government or city of the first class that has adopted a merit system under KRS
70.260 to 70.273, deputies subject to the merit system may organize, form, join, or
participate in organizations in order to engage in lawful concerted activities for the
purpose of collective bargaining or other mutual aid and protection, and to bargain
collectively through a representative of their own free choice. Deputies shall also
have the right to refrain from any or all of these activities but shall be subject to the
lawful provisions of any collective bargaining agreement entered into under this
section. Strikes by deputies of any collective bargaining unit shall be prohibited at
any time.
Page 13 of 18
XXXX 11/25/2024 8:52 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 164
(2) [Except as provided in KRS 336.130, ]In any county containing a consolidated local
government or city of the first class that has adopted a merit system under KRS
70.260 to 70.273, the sheriff shall contract with a representative of the deputies
described in subsection (1) of this section employed by the sheriff where the
representative has established representation of a majority of the deputies, with
respect to wages, hours, and terms and conditions of employment, including
execution of a written contract incorporating any agreement reached between the
sheriff and the representative. The sheriff shall not be required to bargain over
matters of inherent managerial policy.
Section 7. KRS 78.470 is amended to read as follows:
[Except as provided in KRS 336.130, ]In any county in the Commonwealth of Kentucky,
which has a population of 300,000 or more and which has adopted the merit system, the
county employees in the classified service as police may organize, form, join or
participate in organizations in order to engage in lawful concerted activities for the
purpose of collective bargaining or other mutual aid and protection, and to bargain
collectively through representatives of their own free choice. Such employees shall also
have the right to refrain from any or all such activities. Strikes by said members of any
such collective bargaining unit shall be prohibited at any time.
Section 8. KRS 78.480 is amended to read as follows:
[Except as provided in KRS 336.130, ]In any county in the Commonwealth of Kentucky
which has a population of 300,000 or more and which has adopted the merit system for
its police force, the fiscal court may contract with representatives of the police employed
by said county with respect to wages, hours, terms and conditions of employment,
including execution of a written contract incorporating any agreement reached between
the fiscal court and representatives of the police. The fiscal court shall not be required to
bargain over matters of inherent managerial policy.
Section 9. KRS 345.050 is amended to read as follows:
Page 14 of 18
XXXX 11/25/2024 8:52 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 164
(1) [Except as provided in KRS 336.130, ]Public employers, their representatives or
their agents are prohibited from:
(a) Interfering, restraining or coercing firefighters in the exercise of the rights
guaranteed in KRS 345.030;
(b) Dominating or interfering with the formation, existence or administration of
any labor organization;
(c) Discriminating in regard to hiring or tenure of employment or any term or
condition of employment to encourage or discourage membership in any labor
organization, provided that nothing in this section or in any other statute to
the contrary shall preclude a public employer from making an agreement
with a labor organization to require as a condition of employment
membership therein on or after the thirtieth day following the beginning of
such employment or on the effective date of the agreement, whichever is
later;
(d) Discharging or otherwise discriminating against an employee because he or
she has signed or filed any affidavit, petition or complaint or given any
information or testimony under this chapter; or
(e) Refusing to bargain collectively in good faith with a labor organization which
is the exclusive representative of employees in an appropriate unit, including
but not limited to the discussing of grievances with the exclusive
representative.
(2) Labor organizations or their agents are prohibited from:
(a) Restraining or coercing:
1. Firefighters in the exercise of the right guaranteed in subsection (1) of
KRS 345.030, and
2. A public employer in the selection of his or her representative for the
purposes of collective bargaining or the adjustment of grievances; and
Page 15 of 18
XXXX 11/25/2024 8:52 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 164
(b) Refusing to bargain collectively in good faith with a public employer, if they
have been designated in accordance with the provisions of this chapter as the
exclusive representative of firefighters in an appropriate unit.
(3) For the purposes of this chapter, to bargain collectively is to carry out in good faith
the mutual obligation of the parties, or their representatives; to meet together at
reasonable times, including meetings in advance of the budget-making process; to
negotiate in good faith with respect to wages, hours and other conditions of
employment; to negotiate an agreement; to negotiate any question arising under any
agreement; and to execute a written contract incorporating any agreement reached,
if requested by either party. The obligation shall not be interpreted to compel either
party to agree to a proposal, or require either party to make a concession.
Section 10. KRS 336.1341 is amended to read as follows:
KRS 336.133[, 336.134,] and 336.180 shall not apply to any deductions from a public
employee's wages, compensation, or earnings made by the public employer in accordance
with any joint wage agreement or collective bargaining contract entered into, opted into,
modified, renewed, or extended prior to March 29, 2023. However, any joint wage
agreement or collective bargaining contract entered into, opted into, modified, renewed,
or extended after March 29, 2023, as well as any deductions made to a public employee's
wages, compensation, or earnings made in accordance with those joint wage agreements
or collective bargaining contracts or otherwise made after March 29, 2023, shall comply
with KRS 336.133[ and 336.134].
Section 11. KRS 336.135 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, "employee" means any person employed by or suffered or
permitted to work for a public or private employer, except "employee" shall not
mean any person covered by the Federal Railway Labor Act and the National Labor
Relations Act.
(2) An employee shall not be enrolled as a member of a labor organization unless the
Page 16 of 18
XXXX 11/25/2024 8:52 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 164
employee has affirmatively requested membership in writing.
(3) A sum shall not be withheld from the earnings of any employee for the purpose of
paying union dues or other fees paid by members of a labor organization or
employees who are non-members except upon the written or electronic
authorization of the employee member or employee non-member[, unless the
employer is a public employer, in which case KRS 336.134 applies to that
employer].
(4) The requirements in this section shall not be waived by any member or non-
member of a labor organization, nor required to be waived as a condition of
obtaining or maintaining employment.
(5) Signing or refraining from signing the authorization set forth in subsections (2) and
(3) of this section shall not be made a condition of obtaining or maintaining
employment.
(6) (a) A labor organization shall maintain financial records substantially similar to
and no less comprehensive than the records required to be maintained under
29 U.S.C. sec. 431(b).
(b) These records shall be kept in a searchable electronic format and provided to
every employee it represents.
(c) The records and the data or summary by which the records can be verified,
explained, or clarified shall be kept for a period of not less than five (5) years.
(d) A labor organization composed of public employees shall transmit financial
records detailing the labor organization's quarterly expenses to its members on
an annual basis.
(7) This section shall not apply to any agreement between employers and employees or
labor organizations entered into before January 9, 2017, but any such agreement
entered into, opted in, renewed, or extended on or after January 9, 2017, and which
violates this section shall be unlawful and void.
Page 17 of 18
XXXX 11/25/2024 8:52 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 164
(8) This section shall be known as the "Paycheck Protection Act."
Section 12. The following KRS sections are repealed:
65.016 Prohibition against requiring any employer to pay employee a certain wage or
fringe benefit.
336.132 Labor agreement in violation of KRS 336.130 is unlawful and void --
Exceptions.
336.134 Public employer prohibited from deducting from wages of any public employee
for charges to a labor organization or for political activities.
Page 18 of 18
XXXX 11/25/2024 8:52 AM Jacketed